Connecticut, session 2026, SB00396.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 10a-34 of the general statutes is amended by adding
subsection (m) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(NEW) (m) The Office of Higher Education shall permit institutions
of higher education in the state to submit an application for a new
degree program through which a degree may be earned after the
completion of not fewer than ninety credit hours, provided such
program has accreditation recognized by the Secretary of the United
States Department of Education. The office shall conduct a review of
each application submitted under this subsection pursuant to the
provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, a focused or on-
site review, when necessary.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
LCO No. 2037 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 396
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10a-34(m)